Illinois, session 104th, HB5379.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Findings. The General Assembly finds that 5Public Act 103-653 authorized the Adjutant General, on behalf 6of the State of Illinois and the Department of Military 7Affairs, to convey a parcel of real property described in that 8Act to the City of West Frankfort, following the City's 9initial agreement to accept the conveyance. The General 10Assembly further finds that the City of West Frankfort has not 11accepted the conveyance of the parcel and has indicated that 12it does not intend to accept the conveyance. 13    (P.A. 103-653 rep.)14    Section 5. "An Act concerning State government", approved 15July 19, 2024, Public Act 103-653, is repealed. 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 17becoming law.